src/fst/clitics.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no


! Clitics

! %># for clitics to differ them from # in compounds.

LEXICON G  !!≈ * **@CODE@** for ijgo, jiemge, but not *kielâgo
+Foc/ge:%>#g6e  ENDLEX ;
+Foc/go+Use/SpellNoSugg:%>#g6o   ENDLEX ; ! parempi: "ij ko"
KG ; 

LEXICON K !!≈ *  **@CODE@** for kielâgin, but not *ijgo, *jiemge
+Foc/gin:%>#g6in  ENDLEX ;
KG ;

LEXICON KG !!≈ * **@CODE@** all clitics except go, ge ... and except gin
:%> ENDLEX ; ! clitic-less forms ! %>  because .#. doesn't function as it should in twolc-rules
+Qst+Err/Orth:%>#uv KG2 ;
+Qst:%>#%-uv KG2 ;
+Foc/uv:%>#%-uv KG2 ;
+Foc/uv+Foc/gis:%>#%-uvks KG2 ;
+Foc/ba:%>#b6a   ENDLEX ;
+Foc/ba+Err/Orth:%>#b6â   ENDLEX ;
!+Foc/baa:%>#b6á  ENDLEX ; 
!+Foc/baan:%>#b6án  ENDLEX ;
!+Foc/ban:%>#b6an  ENDLEX ;
+Foc/gas:%>#g6âs  ENDLEX ;
+Foc/ges:%>#g6es  ENDLEX ;
+Foc/gis:%>#g6is  ENDLEX ;
+Foc/han:%>#hân  ENDLEX ;
+Foc/nii:%>#nii  ENDLEX ;
+Foc/sun:%>#sun  ENDLEX ;

LEXICON KG2
ENDLEX ;
+Foc/sun:%>#sun  ENDLEX ; ! for lii-uvsun (and others?)
